Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 6 Hay Scales and Platform Balances

47-6-1.
Periodical testing and sealing.

Every person who shall keep hay scales or platform balances for public use shall cause the hay scales or platform balances to be tried and sealed at least once in six (6) months by a sworn sealer of weights and measures.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

47-6-1

.

47-6-2.
Use of unsealed scales.

Every person who shall keep hay scales or platform balances for public use, or shall weigh or suffer to be weighed in these scales or balances any article of merchandise, unless the scales or balances shall have been tried and sealed as provided in §

47-6-1

, shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

47-6-2

.

47-6-3.
Testing when office of sealer is vacant.

Whenever the owner or keeper of hay scales or balances shall apply to the mayor of the city or president of the town council, as the case may be, or to any person by him or her appointed for that purpose, in any town or city in which the office of sealer of weights and measures shall from any cause be vacant, to try the scales or balances, and to seal the scales or balances if found correct, the mayor, president, or person so appointed shall try the scales or balances and seal the scales or balances if found correct; and in case of his or her neglect to do so, the owner or keeper shall be exempt from the fine prescribed in §

47-6-2

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 167, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

47-6-3

.